Utah statutes.
26-8b-302.   Distributors to notify of reporting requirements.
A person in the business of selling or leasing an AED shall, at the time the
person provides, sells, or leases an AED to another person, notify the other
person, in writing, of the reporting requirements described in Section
26-8b-301.
